Indiana, session 2026, HB1012.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-13-2-19, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 90, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 19. (a) Except as specifically provided for in
appropriation acts, every appropriation or part thereof remaining
unexpended and unencumbered at the close of any fiscal year shall
lapse and be returned to the general revenue fund. However, an
appropriation for purchase of real estate or for construction or other
permanent improvement shall not lapse until the purposes for which
the appropriation was made shall have been accomplished or
abandoned, unless such appropriation has remained during an entire
fiscal biennium without any expenditure therefrom or encumbrance
thereon.
(b) Except as otherwise expressly provided by law, the provisions
of this section shall apply to every appropriation of a stated sum for a
specified purpose or purposes made from the general revenue fund, but
shall not, unless expressly so provided by law, apply to any fund or
balance of a fund derived wholly or partly from special taxes, fees,
HB 1012—LS 6241/DI 147


earnings, fines, federal grants, or other sources which are by law
appropriated for special purposes by standing, continuing, rotary, or
revolving appropriations.
(c) In the case of federal funds encumbered by a state agency that
is the recipient of the federal grant, for purposes of meeting
reimbursements that are to come due after the expiration of the federal
grant, the state agency's encumbrance on its ledgers shall be recognized
as valid by the state comptroller for one (1) year or until the money is
expended, whichever is sooner.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (a), beginning with the state
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and each state fiscal year
thereafter, appropriations in the budget bill for Medicaid
assistance that are budgeted for a home and community based
services waiver (as defined in IC 12-8-1.6-2) that remain
unexpended and unencumbered at the close of the state fiscal year
and that would otherwise lapse and be returned to the state general
fund shall not revert to the state general fund, but instead shall be
deposited in the home and community based services waiver
waiting list assistance fund established by IC 12-8-1.6-11.5.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection (a), for the state fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, appropriations
in the budget bill for Medicaid assistance in an amount sufficient
to cover costs incurred by the office of the secretary in:
(1) carrying out the office of the secretary's duties under:
(A) IC 12-8-1.6-4(b)(9) through IC 12-8-1.6(b)(16); and
(B) IC 12-8-1.6-8.5; and
(2) implementing the home and community based services
waiver waiting list assistance fund established by
IC 12-8-1.6-11.5;
that remain unexpended and unencumbered at the close of the
state fiscal year and that would otherwise lapse and be returned to
the state general fund shall not revert to the state general fund, but
instead shall remain available to the office of the secretary to cover
costs described in subdivisions (1) and (2). The appropriations are
not subject to allotment under IC 4-12-1-12.
SECTION 2. IC 12-8-1.6-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.174-2025,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The office of the secretary has all powers
necessary and convenient to administer a home and community based
services waiver.
(b) The office of the secretary shall do the following:
(1) Administer money appropriated or allocated to the office of
HB 1012—LS 6241/DI 147


the secretary by the state, including money appropriated or
allocated for a home and community based services waiver.
(2) Take any action necessary to implement a home and
community based services waiver, including applying to the
United States Department of Health and Human Services for
approval to amend or renew the waiver, implement a new
Medicaid waiver, or amend the Medicaid state plan.
(3) Ensure that a home and community based services waiver is
subject to funding available to the office of the secretary.
(4) Ensure, in coordination with the budget agency, that the cost
of a home and community based services waiver does not exceed
the total amount of funding available by the budget agency,
including state and federal funds, for the Medicaid programs
established to provide services under a home and community
based services waiver.
(5) Establish and administer a program for a home and
community based services waiver to provide an eligible
individual with care that does not cost more than services
provided to a similarly situated individual residing in an
institution.
(6) Within the limits of available resources, provide service
coordination services to individuals receiving services under a
home and community based services waiver, including the
development of an individual service plan that:
(A) addresses an individual's needs;
(B) identifies and considers family and community resources
that are potentially available to meet the individual's needs;
and
(C) is consistent with the person centered care approach for
receiving services under a waiver.
(7) Monitor services provided by a provider that:
(A) provides services to an individual using funds provided by
the office of the secretary or under the authority of the office
of the secretary; or
(B) entered into one (1) or more provider agreements to
provide services under a home and community based services
waiver.
(8) Establish and administer a confidential complaint process for:
(A) an individual receiving; or
(B) a provider described in subdivision (7) providing;
services under a home and community based services waiver.
(9) Establish a procedure for documenting compliance with
HB 1012—LS 6241/DI 147


subdivision (6) in the individual service plan of an individual
receiving services under a home and community based
services waiver, which must include provider attestation that
services delivered to a recipient align with the recipient's
individual service plan.
(10) Beginning not later than January 1, 2027, provide a
monthly statement by electronic means as the default method
of delivery, or in paper form upon a recipient's request, to an
individual receiving services under a home and community
based services waiver that includes the following information:
(A) The amount the state paid for:
(i) home and community based services waiver services;
and
(ii) Medicaid medical services;
provided to the recipient during the preceding month.
(B) The reason for any denial of services to the recipient.
(11) Beginning not later than January 1, 2027, annually
publish on the office of the secretary's website the following
information on each home and community based services
waiver for the preceding state fiscal year:
(A) The amount of state funds that were:
(i) budgeted for; and
(ii) spent under;
each waiver.
(B) The amount billed by providers for each service under
each waiver.
(C) Comparative data on providers, including quality
measures, credentialing, accreditation, and per capita
incident rates.
(12) Not later than January 1, 2027, in collaboration with the
division of disability and rehabilitative services advisory
council established by IC 12-9-4-2, redesign the list of service
providers, including case management organization
providers, available under a home and community based
services waiver to meet the following requirements:
(A) Be electronically searchable by the public.
(B) Be consumer friendly.
(C) Only display information about providers that are
accepting new clients by geographic area.
(D) Include the following information for each provider
described in clause (C):
(i) Provider credentialing and accreditation.
HB 1012—LS 6241/DI 147


(ii) Performance data, including the results of any
provider satisfaction survey.
(13) Each month, publish on the office of the secretary's
website the number of home and community based services
waiver slots that were:
(A) released;
(B) accepted;
(C) declined; and
(D) rescinded;
during the previous month, and the reason for a denial or
rescission.
(14) Provide annual updates concerning home and community
based services waivers to the division of disability and
rehabilitative services advisory council established by
IC 12-9-4-2.
(15) In collaboration with the division of disability and
rehabilitative services advisory council established by
IC 12-9-4-2, review the criteria and process for approving,
monitoring, and removing providers of services under a home
and community based services waiver.
(16) After reviewing the criteria and process described in
subdivision (15), make any changes necessary to ensure
provider accountability and the provision of high quality
services.
(c) The office of the secretary may do the following:
(1) At the office's discretion, delegate any of its authority under
this chapter to any division or office within the office of the
secretary.
(2) Issue administrative orders under IC 4-21.5-3-6 regarding the
provision of a home and community based services waiver.
SECTION 3. IC 12-8-1.6-8.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. (a) As used in this section,
"provider" refers to a provider of services under a home and
community based services waiver.
(b) As used in this section, "recipient" means an individual who
receives services under a home and community based services
waiver.
(c) Before July 1, 2028, the office of the secretary shall conduct
an audit of a provider that:
(1) provides services to less than ten (10) recipients; and
(2) either:
HB 1012—LS 6241/DI 147


(A) has not been audited by or on behalf of the office of the
secretary; or
(B) was audited by or on behalf of the office of the
secretary before July 1, 2021.
(d) After July 1, 2028, at least once each year, the office of the
secretary shall conduct an audit of each provider that provides
services to less than ten (10) recipients.
(e) In conducting an audit under subsection (d), the office of the
secretary shall do the following:
(1) Determine whether the provider is accredited by an
approved national accrediting body (as defined in
IC 12-11-1.1-1(j)).
(2) Evaluate whether the provider is able to deliver services
without interruption for at least three (3) consecutive months
in the absence of payment for services.
SECTION 4. IC 12-8-1.6-9.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9.5. (a) An individual receiving
services under a home and community based services waiver shall
do the following:
(1) Review the recipient's monthly statement received under
section 4(b)(10) of this chapter.
(2) Not later than thirty (30) days after receiving each
monthly statement, report to the office of the secretary or
other appropriate entity any:
(A) error in the statement; or
(B) inconsistency between the statement and services
received.
(b) Upon request, the case manager of a recipient described in
subsection (a) shall do the following:
(1) Assist the recipient in reviewing the recipient's monthly
statement described in subsection (a)(1).
(2) Assist in reporting and resolving any error or
inconsistency under subsection (a).
SECTION 5. IC 12-8-1.6-11.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11.5. (a) As used in this section,
"fund" refers to the home and community based services waiver
waiting list assistance fund established by subsection (b).
(b) The home and community based services waiver waiting list
assistance fund is established to provide individuals on a home and
community based services waiver waiting list with access to
HB 1012—LS 6241/DI 147


supports that promote stability, readiness, and crisis prevention.
(c) The office of the secretary shall administer the fund.
(d) The fund consists of money from the reversion of Medicaid
assistance appropriations deposited in the fund under
IC 4-13-2-19(d).
(e) Money in the fund may be used to provide an individual on
a home and community based services waiver waiting list with any
of the following:
(1) Caregiver or individual training, such as person centered
planning training, skill building training, and self-advocacy
workshops.
(2) Assistive technology devices or adaptive equipment to
support an individual's independence.
(3) Short term stabilization supports to prevent
institutionalization, such as respite care services or
transitional assistance.
(4) Care coordination planning.
(5) Any other supports that promote stability, readiness, and
crisis prevention, as determined by the office of the secretary.
(f) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
money in the fund.
(g) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested.
(h) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
SECTION 6. IC 12-15-2-27 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) When the office of the secretary determines
that an individual is ineligible for Medicaid under this article, the
office of the secretary shall provide to the individual the specific
reason for determining that the individual is ineligible.
(b) In determining an individual's eligibility for Medicaid under
this article based on the individual's total equity value of
nonexempt property, the office of the secretary shall review each
of an individual's bank account that is both:
(1) active; and
(2) contains assets;
at the time of the eligibility determination.
(c) When the office of the secretary issues a notice of ineligibility
under this section, the office of secretary shall:
(1) use plain language; and
HB 1012—LS 6241/DI 147


(2) identify each bank account reviewed under subsection (b),
including the name of the financial institution and last four (4)
numbers of the account.
SECTION 7. IC 12-15-11-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. A provider of services under
a home and community based services waiver (as defined in
IC 12-8-1.6-2) shall do the following:
(1) Upon request by an individual receiving services under the
waiver or the individual's legal guardian, but not more than
once per calendar quarter, provide to the individual or the
individual's legal guardian the provider's accounting records
of service delivery for the recipient.
(2) Upon request, but not more than twice per calendar year,
provide to an individual receiving services under the waiver
an itemized statement of the services billed by the provider
for the recipient. The statement must be in plain language.
HB 1012—LS 6241/DI 147


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Public Health, to which was
referred House Bill 1012, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the House with the
recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 2, between lines 19 and 20, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(e) Notwithstanding subsection (a), for the state fiscal year
beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, appropriations
in the budget bill for Medicaid assistance in an amount sufficient
to cover costs incurred by the office of the secretary in:
(1) carrying out the office of the secretary's duties under:
(A) IC 12-8-1.6-4(b)(9) through IC 12-8-1.6(b)(16); and
(B) IC 12-8-1.6-8.5; and
(2) implementing the home and community based services
waiver waiting list assistance fund established by
IC 12-8-1.6-11.5;
that remain unexpended and unencumbered at the close of the
state fiscal year and that would otherwise lapse and be returned to
the state general fund shall not revert to the state general fund, but
instead shall remain available to the office of the secretary to cover
costs described in subdivisions (1) and (2). The appropriations are
not subject to allotment under IC 4-12-1-12.".
Page 3, line 32, delete "Provide a monthly statement in electronic
form," and insert "Beginning not later than January 1, 2027, provide
a monthly statement by electronic means as the default method of
delivery,".
Page 3, delete lines 36 through 39, begin a new line double block
indented and insert:
"(A) The amount the state paid for:
(i) home and community based services waiver services;
and
(ii) Medicaid medical services;
provided to the recipient during the preceding month.".
Page 3, line 40, delete "(C)" and insert "(B)".
Page 3, line 41, delete "Annually" and insert "Beginning not later
than January 1, 2027, annually".
Page 4, line 9, after "and" insert "per capita".
Page 4, line 19, delete "patients" and insert "clients".
Page 4, line 38, delete "Review" and insert "In collaboration with
the division of disability and rehabilitative services advisory
council established by IC 12-9-4-2, review".
Page 4, line 40, delete "waiver, including removing" and insert
HB 1012—LS 6241/DI 147


"waiver.".
Page 4, delete lines 41 through 42.
Page 5, delete lines 5 through 6.
Page 5, between lines 12 and 13, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 1. IC 12-8-1.6-8.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. (a) As used in this section,
"provider" refers to a provider of services under a home and
community based services waiver.
(b) As used in this section, "recipient" means an individual who
receives services under a home and community based services
waiver.
(c) Before July 1, 2028, the office of the secretary shall conduct
an audit of a provider that:
(1) provides services to less than ten (10) recipients; and
(2) either:
(A) has not been audited by or on behalf of the office of the
secretary; or
(B) was audited by or on behalf of the office of the
secretary before July 1, 2021.
(d) After July 1, 2028, at least once each year, the office of the
secretary shall conduct an audit of each provider that provides
services to less than ten (10) recipients.
(e) In conducting an audit under subsection (d), the office of the
secretary shall do the following:
(1) Determine whether the provider is accredited by an
approved national accrediting body (as defined in
IC 12-11-1.1-1(j)).
(2) Evaluate whether the provider is able to deliver services
without interruption for at least three (3) consecutive months
in the absence of payment for services.".
Page 5, line 15, delete "In order to continue to" and insert "(a) An
individual receiving services under a home and community based
services waiver shall do the following:".
Page 5, delete lines 16 through 18.
Page 5, between lines 26 and 27, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(b) Upon request, the case manager of a recipient described in
subsection (a) shall do the following:
(1) Assist the recipient in reviewing the recipient's monthly
statement described in subsection (a)(1).
(2) Assist in reporting and resolving any error or
inconsistency under subsection (a).".
HB 1012—LS 6241/DI 147


Page 6, line 21, after "Sec. 27." insert "(a)".
Page 6, between lines 24 and 25, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(b) In determining an individual's eligibility for Medicaid
under this article based on the individual's total equity value of
nonexempt property, the office of the secretary shall review each
of an individual's bank account that is both:
(1) active; and
(2) contains assets;
at the time of the eligibility determination.
(c) When the office of the secretary issues a notice of ineligibility
under this section, the office of secretary shall:
(1) use plain language; and
(2) identify each bank account reviewed under subsection (b),
including the name of the financial institution and last four (4)
numbers of the account.".
Page 6, delete lines 30 through 34, begin a new line block indented
and insert:
"(1) Upon request by an individual receiving services under
the waiver or the individual's legal guardian, but not more
than once per calendar quarter, provide to the individual or
the individual's legal guardian the provider's accounting
records of service delivery for the recipient.".
Page 6, line 35, delete "Biannually" and insert "Upon request, but
not more than twice per calendar year,".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1012 as introduced.)
BARRETT
Committee Vote: yeas 12, nays 0.
HB 1012—LS 6241/DI 147